Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF15.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1576XS (2) 91 nls/ko S.F. 15 Section 1. Section 543B.16, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. The application form prepared or 3 furnished by the real estate commission must allow a person 4 holding a real estate broker license who is applying for a real 5 estate salesperson license, or a person holding a real estate 6 salesperson license who is applying for a real estate broker 7 license, to indicate whether the license being applied for 8 shall become effective upon approval of the application or upon 9 the expiration of the applicantâs current license. 10